ru: Стиль крепления грузовика: Дабл-дроп; Дроп-даун; Дроп-тру; Установка заподлицо; Топ-маунт; Другое
hr-HR: Stil montaže kamiona: Dvostruki pad (Double drop); Spušteno (Drop-down); Provučeno (Drop-through); U ravnini s površinom (Flush mount); Gornja montaža (Top mount); Ostalo
th: รูปแบบการติดตั้งทรัค: ดร็อปคู่; ดร็อปดาวน์; ดร็อปทรู; เมาท์แบบฝัง; เมาท์ด้านบน; อื่นๆ
el: Στυλ στήριξης φορτηγού: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Χωνευτή τοποθέτηση; Top mount; Άλλο
bg-BG: Стил на монтаж за камион: Двоен дроп; Дроп-даун; Дроп-тру; Скрит монтаж; Горен монтаж; Друго
fr: Type de montage sur camion: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Montage encastré; Montage par le dessus; Autre
fi: Trukkien asennuksen tyyli: Double drop; Pudotus; Drop-through; Upotettu; Päältä asennettu; Muu
ro-RO: Stil de montare a axului: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Flush mount; Top mount; Altele
en: Truck mounting style: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Flush mount; Top mount; Other
ko: 트럭 장착 스타일: 더블 드롭; 드롭다운; 드롭스루; 플러시 마운트; 탑 마운트; 기타
sv: Typ av lastbilsmontering: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Planmontering; Toppmontering; Annat
sk-SK: Štýl montáže nákladného vozidla: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Flush mount; Top mount; Iné
hu: Teherautó rögzítési stílusa: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Flush mount; Top mount; Egyéb
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt trục xe trượt: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Lắp phẳng; Lắp trên mặt; Khác
zh-CN: 支架安装方式: 双下沉式; 下沉式; 穿透式; 齐平安装; 顶装; 其他
nb: Monteringsstil for truck: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Innfelt montering; Toppmontering; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem em reboque: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Montagem embutida; Montagem superior; Outro
pl: Styl mocowania w ciężarówce: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Flush mount; Top mount; Inne
cs: Styl montáže na nákladní vůz: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Zapuštěná montáž; Horní montáž; Ostatní
it: Stile di montaggio del truck: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Montaggio a incasso; Top mount; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem dos eixos: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Embutido; Top mount; Outro
zh-TW: 卡車安裝樣式: 雙降式; 下沉式; 穿透式; 嵌入式安裝; 頂部安裝; 其他
de: Montageart der Achse: Double-Drop; Dropdown; Drop-Through; Flush-Mount; Top-Mount; Sonstiges
ja: トラックマウントスタイル: ダブルドロップ; ドロップダウン; ドロップスルー; フラッシュマウント; トップマウント; その他
es: Estilo de montaje en camiones: Caída doble; Montaje rebajado; Montaje a través; Montaje al ras; Montaje superior; Otro
tr: Kamyon montaj stili: Çift drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Gömme montaj; Üstten montaj; Diğer
lt-LT: Sunkvežimio montavimo stilius: Dvigubo pažeminimo („Double drop“); Pažemintas („Drop-down“); Įleistas („Drop-through“); Lygus montavimas; Tvirtinamas viršuje („Top mount“); Kita
da: Monteringsstil for trucks: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Planmontering; Topmontering; Andet
sl-SI: Stil montaže podvozja: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Flush mount; Top mount; Drugo
nl: Montagestijl truck: Double drop; Drop-down; Drop-through; Flush mount; Top mount; Anders